src/noun-vep-morph.txt
LEXICON Adj-rusked
 AdjTag ;

LEXICON AdjTag ! beginning 
+A: SGNOMSUF ;
+A: SGGENSUF ;
+A: SGACCSUF ;
+A: SGPARTSUF ;
+A: SGTRASUF ;
+A: SGABESUF ;
+A: SGCOMSUF ;
+A: SGINESUF ;
+A: SGILLSUF ;
+A: SGADESUF ;
+A: SGABlSUF ;
+A: SGALLSUF ;
+A: SGESSSUF ;
+A: SGPRLSUF ;
+A: SGAPR1SUF ;
+A: SGAPR2SUF ;
+A: SGEGRSUF ;
+A: SGTER1SUF ;
+A: SGTER2SUF ;
+A: SGADD1SUF ;
+A: SGADD2SUF ;

+A: PLNOMSUF ;
+A: PLGENSUF ;
+A: PLACCSUF ;
+A: PLPARTSUF ;
+A: PLTRASUF ;
+A: PLABESUF ;
+A: PLCOMSUF ;
+A: PLINESUF ;
+A: PLILLSUF ;
+A: PLADESUF ;
+A: PLABlSUF ;
+A: PLALLSUF ;
+A: PLESSSUF ;
+A: PLPRLSUF ;
+A: PLAPR1SUF ;
+A: PLAPR2SUF ;
+A: PLEGRSUF ;
+A: PLTER1SUF ;
+A: PLTER2SUF ;
+A: PLADD1SUF ;
+A: PLADD2SUF ;

LEXICON N-muna ! Stem vowel alternation ZERO-A-ZERO
:QAQ1 NOUN ;

LEXICON N-marj 
:QAO1 NOUN ;

LEXICON N-shapuk ! šapuk
:U1 NOUN ;

LEXICON N-landeh ! OUN-EH
:EH1 NOUN ;

LEXICON N-kel
:QEQ1 NOUN ;

LEXICON N-cipuine
:INE1 NOUN ;

LEXICON N-noruz ! OUN-ZD_QEQ
:D1E1 NOUN ;

LEXICON N-kojaduz ! z s _QEQ
:ZS1 NOUN ;

LEXICON N-vedäi ! i j _QAQ1 Does this work like _muna_?
:QAQ1 NOUN ;

LEXICON N-veps 
:QÄQ1 NOUN ;

LEXICON NTag ! nado
 NOUN ;

!! 

LEXICON NOUN
+N: SGNOMSUF ;
+N: SGGENSUF ;
+N: SGACCSUF ;
+N: SGPARTSUF ;
+N: SGTRASUF ;
+N: SGABESUF ;
+N: SGCOMSUF ;
+N: SGINESUF ;
+N: SGILLSUF ;
+N: SGELASUF ;
+N: SGADESUF ;
+N: SGABlSUF ;
+N: SGALLSUF ;
+N: SGESSSUF ;
+N: SGPRLSUF ;
+N: SGAPR1SUF ;
+N: SGAPR2SUF ;
+N: SGEGRSUF ;
+N: SGTER1SUF ;
+N: SGTER2SUF ;
+N: SGTER3SUF ;
+N: SGADD1SUF ;
+N: SGADD2SUF ;

+N: PLNOMSUF ;
+N: PLGENSUF ;
+N: PLACCSUF ;
+N: PLPARTSUF ;
+N: PLTRASUF ;
+N: PLABESUF ;
+N: PLCOMSUF ;
+N: PLINESUF ;
+N: PLELASUF ;
+N: PLILLSUF ;
+N: PLADESUF ;
+N: PLABlSUF ;
+N: PLALLSUF ;
+N: PLESSSUF ;
+N: PLPRLSUF ;
+N: PLAPR1SUF ;
+N: PLAPR2SUF ;
+N: PLEGRSUF ;
+N: PLTER1SUF ;
+N: PLTER2SUF ;
! +N: PLTER3SUF ; ! Does this exist
+N: PLADD1SUF ;
+N: PLADD2SUF ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! PROPER NOUNS !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON ACRONDELIMITER ! Here we need some kind of vowel harmony
    PROP ;
:%: PROP ;
:%- PROP ;
:%' PROP ;

LEXICON PROP
+Prop: NOUN ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! ACTUAL CASES !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON SGNOMSUF
+Sg+Nom: K ;

LEXICON SGGENSUF
+Sg+Gen:%>n K ;

LEXICON SGACCSUF
+Sg+Acc:%>n K ;

LEXICON SGPARTSUF
+Sg+Part:%>d K ; ! d/t

LEXICON SGTRASUF
+Sg+Tra:%>ks K ;

LEXICON SGABESUF
+Sg+Abe:%^DEVOICE%>ta K ;

LEXICON SGCOMSUF
+Sg+Com:%>nke K ;

LEXICON SGINESUF
+Sg+Ine:%>s K ; ! s/š kül’betiš 

LEXICON SGELASUF
+Sg+Ela:%>späi K ; ! späi/špäi 

LEXICON SGILLSUF
+Sg+Ill:%>hV1 K ; ! o-ho

LEXICON SGADESUF
+Sg+Ade:%>l K ;

LEXICON SGABlSUF
+Sg+Abl:%>lpäi K ;

LEXICON SGALLSUF
+Sg+All:%>le K ;

LEXICON SGESSSUF ! Essive-instructive
+Sg+EssInst:%>n K ;

LEXICON SGPRLSUF
+Sg+Prl:%>dme K ;

LEXICON SGAPR1SUF
+Sg+Apr1:%>nno K ;

LEXICON SGAPR2SUF
+Sg+Apr2:%>nnoks K ;

LEXICON SGEGRSUF
+Sg+Egr:%>nnopäi K ;

LEXICON SGTER1SUF
+Sg+Ter1:%>hV1sai K ;

LEXICON SGTER2SUF
+Sg+Ter2:%>lesai K ;

LEXICON SGTER3SUF
+Sg+Ter3:%>ssai K ;

LEXICON SGADD1SUF
+Sg+Add1:%>hV1päi K ;

LEXICON SGADD2SUF
+Sg+Add2:%>lepäi K ;






!! Start Plural
LEXICON PLNOMSUF
+Pl+Nom:%>d K ;

LEXICON PLGENSUF
+Pl+Gen:%>iden K ;
+Pl+Gen:%>id'en K ;

LEXICON PLACCSUF
+Pl+Acc:%>d K ;

LEXICON PLPARTSUF
+Pl+Part:%>id K ; ! d/t

LEXICON PLTRASUF
+Pl+Tra:%>ikš K ;

LEXICON PLABESUF
+Pl+Abe:%>i%^DEVOICEta K ;

LEXICON PLCOMSUF
+Pl+Com:%>idenke K ;

LEXICON PLINESUF
+Pl+Ine:%>iš K ; ! s/š kül’betiš 

LEXICON PLELASUF
+Pl+Ela:%>išpäi K ; ! späi/špäi 

LEXICON PLILLSUF
+Pl+Ill:%>ihe K ; ! o-ho

LEXICON PLADESUF
+Pl+Ade:%>il K ;

LEXICON PLABlSUF
+Pl+Abl:%>ilpäi K ;

LEXICON PLALLSUF
+Pl+All:%>ile K ;

LEXICON PLESSSUF ! Essive-instructive
+Pl+EssInst:%>in K ;

LEXICON PLPRLSUF
+Pl+Prl:%>idme K ;

LEXICON PLAPR1SUF
+Pl+Apr1:%>idenno K ;

LEXICON PLAPR2SUF
+Pl+Apr2:%>idennoks K ;

LEXICON PLEGRSUF
+Pl+Egr:%>idennopäi K ;

LEXICON PLTER1SUF
+Pl+Ter1:%>ihesai K ;

LEXICON PLTER2SUF
+Pl+Ter2:%>ilesai K ;

LEXICON PLADD1SUF
+Pl+Add1:%>ihepäi K ;

LEXICON PLADD2SUF
+Pl+Add2:%>ilepäi K ;





!! Possessor Indices
